Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BIOFUEL INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $4,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $4,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants that enable retail petroleum dispensers, fuel storage tanks, and other equipment to dispense biofuels to the public in accordance with the biofuel replacement goals established under Minnesota Statutes, section 239.7911. A retail petroleum dispenser selling petroleum for use in spark ignition engines for vehicle model years after 2000 is eligible if the retail petroleum dispenser has no more than 15 retail petroleum dispensing sites and each site is located in Minnesota. The grant money must be used to replace or upgrade equipment that does not have the ability to be certified for E25. A grant award must not exceed $200,000 per station. Any unused money from fiscal year 2026 may be available during fiscal year 2027. The base for this appropriation for fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $3,000,000. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of agriculture must cooperate with biofuel stakeholders in the implementation of the grant program. The commissioner of agriculture, in cooperation with any economic or community development financial institution and any other entity with which the commissioner contracts, must submit a report on the biofuels infrastructure financial assistance program by January 15 of each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. The annual report must include but is not limited to a summary of: new text end new text begin (1) the number and types of projects financed; new text end new text begin (2) the amount of dollars leveraged or matched per project; new text end new text begin (3) the geographic distribution of financed projects; new text end new text begin (4) any market expansion associated with upgraded infrastructure; new text end new text begin (5) the demographics of the areas served; new text end new text begin (6) the costs of the program; and new text end new text begin (7) the number of grants to minority-owned or female-owned businesses. new text end